test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lwpma49_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `lõpma: # Verb (49) `lõpma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lõpma+V+Inf/mA: lõpma
     lõpma+V+Inf: lõppõq
     lõpma+V+Act+PrfPrc: lõpnuq
     lõpma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: lõpõt
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lõpõ
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lõpõs
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lõppi
     lõpma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lõppi
